Montana, session 2025, HB591.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:


NEW SECTION. Section 1. Celebrate freedom week .. (1) To educate students about the
sacrifices made for freedom in the founding of the United States and the values on which the United States was
founded, the last full week of classes in September must be recognized in public schools as c elebrate f reedom
w eek.

(2) (a) Celebrate freedom week must include at least 3 hours of instruction in each social studies
class regarding the topics provided in subsections (2) (b) and (2)(c), as determined by the trustees of a school
district.
(b) The celebrate freedom week instruction must include an in-depth study of the intent, meaning,
and importance of the Declaration of Independence, the United States constitution, including the bill of rights,
and the Montana constitution in their historical context.
(c) The study of the Declaration of Independence must include the relationship of the ideas
expressed in the declaration to subsequent American history, including the relationship of the declaration's
ideas to:
(i) the rich diversity of our people as a nation of immigrants;
(ii) the American revolution;
(iii) the formulation of the United States constitution; and
(iv) the abolitionist movement, which led to the emancipation proclamation and the women's
suffrage movement.

(3) During celebrate freedom week, the trustees of a school district shall ensure that all pupils in
grades 3 through 12 recite the following text at the beginning of each school day:
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 591

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0591.2
"We hold these truths to be self-evident, that all men are created equal, that they are endowed by their
creator with certain unalienable rights, that among these are life, liberty and the pursuit of happiness --that to
secure these rights, governments are instituted among men, deriving their just powers from the consent of the
governed."
(4) A school district shall excuse a student from the recitation required in subsection (3) on written
request from a student's parent or guardian. The provisions of subsection (3) do not apply to a student who:
(a) has a conscientious objection to the recitation; or
(b) is the child of a representative of a foreign government to whom the United States government
extends diplomatic immunity.

SECTION 1. Section 20-1-306, MCA, is amended to read:
"20-1-306. Commemorative exercises on certain days. (1) All districts shall conduct appropriate
exercises during the school day on the following commemorative days:
(a) Lincoln's Birthday (February 12);
(b) Washington's Birthday (February 22);
(c) Arbor Day (last Friday in April);
(d) Flag Day (June 14);
(e) Citizenship Day (September 17);
(f) American Indian Heritage Day (fourth Friday in September);
(g) Columbus Day (October 12);
(h) Pioneer Day (November 1);
(i) Freedom Week (last full week of September), to educate students about the sacrifices made for
freedom in the founding of the United States and the values on which the United States was founded;
(j) other days designated by the legislature or governor as legal holidays.
(2) When these commemorative days fall on Saturday or Sunday, exercises may be conducted the
preceding Friday.
(3) The trustees of a district shall adopt a policy to address and ensure the effective conduct of
appropriate exercises for the commemorative days provided in subsection (1)."
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – HB 591

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0591.2


NEW SECTION. Section 2 .. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an
integral part of Title 20, chapter 7, part 1, and the provisions of Title 20, chapter 7, part 1, apply to [section 1].

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Effective date. [This act] is effective July 1, 2025.
- END -
- 4 - Authorized Print Version – HB 591